Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-2,131
Musical instruments furnished by students; fee authorized; when.

A governing body may require students to furnish musical instruments for participation in optional music courses that are not extracurricular activities if the governing body provides for the use of a musical instrument without charge for any student who qualifies for free or reduced-price lunches under United States Department of Agriculture child nutrition programs. Participation in a free-lunch program or reduced-price lunch program is not required to qualify for free or reduced-price lunches for purposes of this section. This section does not require a governing body to provide for the use of a particular type of musical instrument for any student. For musical extracurricular activities, a governing body may require fees or require students to provide specialized equipment, such as musical instruments, or specialized attire consistent with the Public Elementary and Secondary Student Fee Authorization Act.

Laws 2002, LB 1172, § 7;

Laws 2003, LB 249, § 7.